Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Part 1 Primacy and Reclamation Act of Tennessee [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]
59-8-127. Department employee prohibited from having financial interest in underground coal mining operation or surface coal mining and reclamation operation. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

No employee of the department performing any function or duty under this part shall have a direct or indirect financial interest in any underground coal mining operation or surface coal mining and reclamation operation.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-128. Part ancillary and supplemental to other state laws. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

This part does not operate to repeal or affect any of the laws of this state relating to the pollution of the air or waters, or any environment and conservation or mining laws, but shall be held and construed as ancillary and supplemental thereto.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-129. Conformance with statutes and rules. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

Irrespective of the date of issuance of a permit, all operators, permittees, and persons, except as provided in subsection (b), shall immediately conform to any statutes enacted, or rules adopted pursuant to those statutes, on the effective date of such statutes and rules. This section does not require the regrading or replanting of any area on which the work was satisfactorily performed prior to the effective date of the statute or rule.

The board shall promulgate rules under § 59-8-103(b)(1) that are consistent with 30 CFR 773.4 concerning continued operations under federal program permits.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-130. Compliance by agency, unit, or instrumentality of state, federal, or local government. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

Any agency, unit, or instrumentality of state, federal, or local government, including any publicly owned utility or publicly owned corporation of state, federal, or local government, that proposes to engage in exploration or mining operations that are subject to this part, shall comply with this part; provided, that local governmental entities and state agencies are not subject to fees or bonds except as otherwise required by this part.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-131. Hearing involving major energy project. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

Any hearing required by this part shall be conducted in accordance with §13-18-114, when the hearing involves a major energy project, as defined by §13-18-102.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-132. Coal mining protection fund.

There is created a segregated account within the state treasury to be known as the “coal mining protection fund.” Monies shall be deposited to the fund pursuant to §§ 59-8-107, 59-8-117, and 67-7-110, and shall be invested for the benefit of the fund pursuant to § 9-4-603.

The moneys in the coal mining protection fund shall be used for the administration and enforcement of the requirements of this part.

All fees and penalties collected by the commissioner pursuant to this part shall be deposited by the state treasurer into the coal mining protection fund, created in subsection (a), and shall be used by the commissioner to defray expenses necessary to administer this part. Unexpended and unobligated fees remaining in this account at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain available for the purposes set forth in this part.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. April 25, 2018.

Attorney General Opinions. The Governor’s efforts to submit requests for federal funding and applications to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface mining and reclamation operations do not constitute “implementation” of part 1 of chapter 8, title 59, of the Tennessee Code and are not subject to the availability of federal funds under T.C.A. §59-8-133(a). The cost of implementation and enforcement must be paid by equal amounts of federal funds and money in the coal mining protection fund. If no federal funds are available, then no money from the coal mining protection fund may be spent because such an expenditure would not be in “equal proportion” to the amount of federal funds spent. OAG 18-26, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 26 (6/27/2018).

59-8-133. Implementation of part — Cost of administering and enforcing part. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

Implementation of this part is subject to the availability of federal funds for such purpose.

The cost of administering and enforcement of this part shall be paid in equal proportions by federal funds made available for such purpose and funds in the coal mining protection fund, created in § 59-8-132.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

Attorney General Opinions. The Governor’s efforts to submit requests for federal funding and applications to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface mining and reclamation operations do not constitute “implementation” of part 1 of chapter 8, title 59, of the Tennessee Code and are not subject to the availability of federal funds under T.C.A. §59-8-133(a). The cost of implementation and enforcement must be paid by equal amounts of federal funds and money in the coal mining protection fund. If no federal funds are available, then no money from the coal mining protection fund may be spent because such an expenditure would not be in “equal proportion” to the amount of federal funds spent. OAG 18-26, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 26 (6/27/2018).

59-8-134. Report required for revenues generated from fees. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

On or before the January 1 occurring two (2) years after the effective date of this part [See the Compiler's Notes], and on or before January 1 every two (2) years thereafter, the department of environment and conservation shall submit a report to the finance, ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate on the revenue generated from the fees imposed by this part. The department shall include in the report a determination as to whether an adjustment to the fees is necessary to provide that the administration and enforcement of this part is fiscally self-sufficient and that the revenues from the fees are sufficient to meet required expenditures.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 43.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]